Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.180

Number of signatures required.

When the person, committee, or organization demanding the recall of a public officer has secured sufficient signatures upon the recall petition the person, committee, or organization may submit the same to the officer with whom the charge was filed for filing in his or her office. The number of signatures required shall be as follows:

(1) In the case of a state officer, an officer of a city of the first class, a member of a school board in a city of the first class, or a county officer of a county with a population of forty thousand or more—signatures of legal voters equal to twenty-five percent of the total number of votes cast for all candidates for the office to which the officer whose recall is demanded was elected at the preceding election.

(2) In the case of an officer of any political subdivision, city, town, township, precinct, or school district other than those mentioned in subsection (1) of this section, and in the case of a state senator or representative—signatures of legal voters equal to thirty-five percent of the total number of votes cast for all candidates for the office to which the officer whose recall is demanded was elected at the preceding election.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1414. Prior: 1991 c 363 s 36; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.060; prior: 1913 c 146 s 8, part; RRS s 5357, part. Formerly RCW 29.82.060.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Recall of elective officers—Percentages required: State Constitution Art. 1 s 34 (Amendment 8).